Tennessee statutes. Title 18 Clerks Of Courts
Part 5

State Court Clerks' Conference

18-1-501. Creation and membership of conference.

There is created the Tennessee state court clerks' conference, which shall be the official organization of the circuit court clerks, clerks and masters, criminal court clerks, juvenile court clerks, probate clerks and elected general sessions court clerks in this state. The membership of the conference shall consist of all circuit court clerks, clerks and masters, elected probate clerks, criminal court clerks, juvenile court clerks and elected general sessions court clerks in this state. Deputies of the clerks shall be associate members of the conference.

Acts 1982, ch. 852, § 1.

18-1-502. Rules, regulations, and bylaws.

The state court clerks' conference is authorized to adopt and, from time to time, amend such rules, regulations, or bylaws as it considers necessary for the conduct of its affairs. The rules, regulations or bylaws shall provide for the election of a president, vice president, secretary and such other officers as the conference considers advisable, for the method of selection of the officers, and for such other matters consistent with the general laws of the state as the conference may choose.

Acts 1982, ch. 852, § 2; 1985, ch. 239, § 2.

18-1-503. Calling meetings — Notice — Seminars.

The president of the conference may call meetings at will, upon at least ten (10) days' written notice to members, and shall call at least one (1) meeting annually. The annual meeting shall provide educational seminars or training for the membership in addition to the business sessions. The conference may from time to time provide additional education seminars for its membership in cooperation with the administrative director of the courts and the University of Tennessee's center for government training.

Acts 1982, ch. 852, § 3; 1985, ch. 239, § 3; 1993, ch. 66, § 41.

18-1-504. Attendance.

The maximum number of individuals attending from a clerk's office in a county will be determined by the classification of counties as enumerated in § 8-24-101. The ratio of individuals from each clerk's office allowed to attend per classification is as follows:

Counties of the first class — 12;

Counties of the second class — 10;

Counties of the third class — 8;

Counties of the fourth class — 6;

Counties of the fifth class — 4;

Counties of the sixth class — 2;

Counties of the seventh class — 2; and

Counties of the eighth class — 2.

If a clerk's office in a county does not have the maximum number of attendees, other clerks' offices in the county may send additional people to meetings of the state court clerks' conference. The total number of attendees from all clerks' offices within each county shall not exceed the total established by adding the number of attendees allowed for each clerk's office within the county, as enumerated in § 8-24-101.

Acts 1982, ch. 852, § 4; 1990, ch. 764, § 1.

18-1-505. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §18-1-505 (Acts 1982, ch. 852, § 5), concerning travel expenses, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 449, § 3. For new law, see §§67-4-602 —67-4-606.

18-1-506. Administration of seminar.

The seminar described in §18-1-503 shall be administered by the administrative director of the courts and the administrative director's staff in cooperation with the conference. The state, through the administrative office of the courts, shall pay for all expenses incurred in administering the seminar.

Acts 1982, ch. 852, § 6; 1993, ch. 66, § 42.

Cross-References. Duties of administrative director of the courts, §16-3-803.

18-1-507. Meetings.

The conference shall meet annually and at other times as provided in this part for consideration of any and all matters pertaining to the discharge of the official duties and obligations of its members, and for the purpose of education and training, to the end that there be a more prompt and efficient administration of the duties and responsibilities of the state clerks and their offices.

It is the official duty of each member of the conference to attend its meetings unless otherwise officially engaged, or for good and sufficient reasons.

Acts 1985, ch. 239, §§ 1, 4.

Cross-References. Calling of meetings, §18-1-503.

18-1-508. Duties — Committee on drafting and monitoring legislation.

It is the duty of the conference to give consideration to the enactment of such laws and rules or procedure as in its judgment may be necessary to the more effective operation of the offices of the state court clerks. To this end a committee of its members shall be appointed to draft suitable legislation and submit its recommendations to the general assembly and to monitor legislation otherwise submitted that impacts upon the operation of the state court clerks' offices.

Acts 1985, ch. 239, § 1.